Washington statutes.
RCW 36.145.030

Public hearing on petition—When held.

A public hearing on the petition for formation of a district must be held by each applicable legislative authority, not less than thirty, but not more than sixty days, from the date that the lead county auditor issues the certificate of sufficiency required under RCW 36.145.020.

[ 2010 c 7 s 202.]